Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201413-513
Auditor; request information.

The auditor shall, on or before December 1 each year, request information
from each governing body in a form prescribed by the auditor regarding (1) trade names, corporate names, or other
business names under which the governing body operates and (2) agreements
to which the governing body is a party under the Interlocal Cooperation Act
and the Joint Public Agency Act. Each governing body shall provide such information
to the auditor on or before December 31.

Laws 2004, LB 939, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB192, § 1.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.